NLP - Project/magahi/magahi-val.dix
	<pardef n = "aluv">
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kuvaz">
	  <e><p><l>veM</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>veM</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>veM</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>veM</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "gehuzv">
	  <e><p><l>eM</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>eM</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>eM</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>eM</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "sonarav">
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kroXav">
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "laikav">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ano</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "rajav">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "Garav">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "Karacav">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kaviy">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "axamiy">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "sawruva">
	  <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "alu">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kuvaz">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "gehuMva">
	  <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "sonarav">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kroXav">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kariya">
	  <e><p><l>kko</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>vA</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
  </pardefs>
